Wisconsin, session 2025, AB284.
do enact as follows:AB284,11Section 1. 13.48 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB284,2,8213.48 (4) State agencies to report proposed projects. Whenever any 3state agency contemplates a project under the state building program it shall report 4the project to the building commission. The report shall be made on such date and 5in such manner as the building commission prescribes. Each state agency 6submitting a report to the building commission under this subsection shall at the 7same time submit the report to the joint committee on finance. This subsection 8does not apply to projects identified in sub. (10) (c).AB284,29Section 2. 13.48 (19) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB284,2,111013.48 (19) (am) 1. In this paragraph, “agency” has the meaning given in s. 1116.52 (7).AB284,2,15122. For any project costing $200,000,000 or more, at the request of the agency 13for which the project is constructed, the building commission shall waive the 14requirements under s. 16.855 for the project, except s. 16.855 (1p), (13), and (14m) 15(a) to (c), as requested by the agency.AB284,316Section 3. 16.007 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB284,3,51716.007 (2m) Timeline for certain claims. Any claim referred to the claims 18board that relates to a contract with the department of transportation for 1transportation infrastructure improvement or to a contract with the department of 2administration or the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System that 3is awarded under s. 16.855 shall be heard by the claims board and the claims board 4shall make a final determination upon the claim within 6 months from the date 5that the claim was referred to the claims board.AB284,46Section 4. 16.40 (20b) of the statutes is created to read:AB284,3,10716.40 (20b) Building program changes. Submit a quarterly report no later 8than the last day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter to the 9joint committee on finance and each voting member of the building commission that 10includes all of the following:AB284,3,1311(a) An identification of each project for which the building commission 12approved during the quarter a budget increase under s. 20.924 (1) (d), including a 13description of the project and the amount of the increase.AB284,3,1714(b) An identification of each project enumerated in the authorized state 15building program for which the department estimates a budget increase will be 16necessary for project completion, including a description of the project and the 17reasons for the project budget shortfall.AB284,518Section 5. 16.855 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB284,3,211916.855 (3m) (a) In this subsection, “bidding period” means the period 20beginning on the date of first publication of the advertisement for proposals and 21ending on the date of bid opening.AB284,4,222(b) At any time more than 2 days prior to the end of the bidding period, a 1bidder or potential bidder may submit a question to the department concerning the 2project being bid.AB284,4,53(c) The department may issue addenda at any time during the bidding period 4to modify or clarify the drawings and specifications for the project being bid or to 5extend the bidding period.AB284,66Section 6. 16.858 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB284,4,10716.858 (3m) The department and the Board of Regents of the University of 8Wisconsin System shall collaborate with energy service companies to identify and 9execute pilot projects under this section using financing provided by the companies 10to upgrade facilities, reduce deferred maintenance, and increase sustainability.AB284,711Section 7. 16.867 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB284,4,161216.867 (2) If the estimated cost of a construction project under the 13department’s supervision is $7,400,000 $15,000,000 or more, the selection 14committee appointed under sub. (1) shall use a request-for-proposal process 15established by the department to select an architect or engineer for the project 16based on qualifications.AB284,817Section 8. 16.899 of the statutes is created to read:AB284,4,211816.899 Utilities-related costs. Each contract for construction work under 19this subchapter shall state which party to the contract is responsible for paying 20project utility service connection charges and which party is responsible for paying 21for costs related to the consumption of utility services at the project site.AB284,922Section 9. 20.924 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB284,5,62320.924 (1) (a) Shall authorize the design and construction of any building, 1structure, or facility costing in excess of $1,000,000 $2,000,000 regardless of 2funding source, only if that project is enumerated in the authorized state building 3program. Beginning in fiscal year 2023-24, this amount is $2,000,000. The 4construction of any building, structure, or facility may not be enumerated in the 5authorized state building program unless the building commission determines that 6at least 50 percent of the project’s design phase has been completed.AB284,107Section 10. 775.01 of the statutes is renumbered 775.01 (1) and amended to 8read:AB284,5,159775.01 (1) Upon Subject to sub. (2), upon the refusal of the legislature to allow 10a claim against the state the claimant may commence an action against the state by 11service as provided in s. 801.11 (3) and by filing with the clerk of court a bond, not 12exceeding $1,000, with 2 or more sureties, to be approved by the attorney general, to 13the effect that the claimant will indemnify the state against all costs that may 14accrue in such action and pay to the clerk of court all costs, in case the claimant fails 15to obtain judgment against the state. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab284 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab284 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB284 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB284 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB284: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting